Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-332.01
Manufacturer; preselling activities; approval required.

Each manufacturer shall receive departmental approval prior to selling in this state any type of pickle card, pickle card unit, punchboard, or other similar card, board, or ticket included in section 9-315 whether referred to by any other name intended for resale in Nebraska. Approval by the department shall be based upon, but not limited to, the manufacture, assembly, and packaging of pickle cards or pickle card units and any other specifications imposed by the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 30;

Laws 1996, LB 1277, § 6.